Utah statutes.
31A-17-405.   Fraternal rates and reserves.

(1)  A fraternal may be organized for the transaction of business on a plan set forth in the contract which provides for sufficient contributions by each member each year to pay the member's share of the actual death claims of the year, through advance payments graded according to a mortality table approved by the commissioner, without any reserve, or with a reserve which may accumulate from overpayments of individual members.  If this type of reserve does accumulate, each member shall be informed each year of the member's credit and of the cost of the member's insurance.

(2)  Each fraternal shall collect regular premiums for each coverage it provides at adequate rates that are approved by the commissioner or conform to standards set by rules adopted by the commissioner.

(3)  The reserves of a fraternal are subject to the same requirements as those of Chapter 5 insurers writing the same coverages, except that the commissioner may authorize the use of suitable fraternal mortality tables or other appropriate tables instead of the tables used by Chapter 5 insurers.



Enacted by Chapter 242, 1985 General Session

